Louisiana, session 2026, HB1007.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9084 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9084. Faubourg Nouveau Marigny Improvement District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of Orleans, as more specifically
provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate which shall
be known as the Faubourg Nouveau Marigny Improvement District, referred to in
this Section as the "district". The district shall be a political subdivision of the state
as defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The boundaries of the district shall include the area located within the
following perimeter: St. Bernard Avenue, North Claiborne Avenue, Elysian Fields
Avenue, St. Claude Avenue, and Joseph Guillaume Place.
C. The purpose of the district shall be to promote and encourage the
beautification and overall betterment of the Faubourg Nouveau Marigny
neighborhood.
D.(1) The district shall be governed by a board of commissioners, referred
to in this Section as the "board", composed of five members as follows:
(a) The president and vice president of the New Marigny Neighborhood
Association.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1007 ENROLLED
(b) Three members elected by the residents of the district. The elected
members must be residents of the district.
(2)(a) Elected members shall serve two-year terms after serving initial terms
as provided in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph.
(b) Two members shall serve an initial term of one year and one member
shall serve an initial term of two years as determined by lot at the first meeting of the
board. Members shall be eligible for reelection.
(3) The members of the board shall select from among themselves a
president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer. The duties of the officers shall be
fixed by bylaws adopted by the board.
(4) The members of the board shall serve without compensation.
(5) The minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the
board's secretary. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the
official custody of the board.
(6) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary
or advisable for conducting its business affairs. Rules and regulations of the board
relative to the notice and conduct of meetings shall conform to the Open Meetings
Law. The board shall hold regular meetings as shall be provided for in the bylaws
and may hold special meetings at such times and places within the district as may be
provided in the bylaws. The board shall also be subject to the Public Records Law
and the Code of Governmental Ethics.
(7) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make
them available through the board's secretary.
E. The district, acting through its board, shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To sue and be sued.
(2) To adopt bylaws and regulations.
(3) To enter into contracts and cooperative agreements.
(4) To solicit and accept funds, grants, donations, and appropriations.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1007 ENROLLED
(5) To purchase property within the district.
(6) To fund beautification, landscaping, and streetscape projects.
(7) To improve infrastructure, lighting, and signage.
(8) To organize neighborhood clean-ups and community events.
(9) To support blight remediation efforts.
(10) To collaborate with city agencies and private partners on improvement
initiatives.
F.(1) The governing authority of the city of New Orleans may impose and
collect a parcel fee within the district subject to and in accordance with the
provisions of this Subsection.
(2)(a) The amount of the fee shall be as provided by duly adopted resolution
of the board.
(b)(i) The fee for improved residential parcels shall be a flat fee per parcel
of land not to exceed one hundred dollars per year.
(ii) If the owner of the parcel qualifies for and receives a special assessment
level as provided in Article VII, Section 18(G)(1) of the Constitution of Louisiana,
then the fee shall be a flat fee per parcel of land not to exceed twenty-five dollars per
year.
(c) The fee for improved commercial parcels shall be a flat fee per parcel of
land not to exceed one hundred dollars per year.
(d) The fee for unimproved commercial and residential parcels shall be a flat
fee per parcel of land not to exceed five hundred dollars per year.
(e)(i) The fee for improved parcels that are used for both commercial and
residential purposes shall be a flat fee per parcel of land not to exceed two hundred
dollars per year.
(ii) If the owner of the parcel qualifies for and receives a homestead
exemption as provided in Article VII, Section 20 of the Constitution of Louisiana,
then the fee shall be a flat fee per parcel of land not to exceed one hundred dollars
per year.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1007 ENROLLED
(iii) No fee shall be imposed upon any parcel whose owner qualifies for and
receives a homestead exemption as provided in Article VII, Section 20 of the
Constitution of Louisiana and a special assessment level as provided in Article VII,
Section 18(G)(1) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(3)(a) For purposes of this Section, "parcel" means a lot, a subdivided
portion of ground, an individual tract, or a "condominium parcel" as defined in R.S.
9:1121.103.
(b) The owner of each parcel shall be responsible for payment of the fee.
(4)(a) The fee shall be imposed only after the question of its imposition has
been approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district who vote on the
proposition at an election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code. The amount of the fee may be changed by duly adopted resolution
of the board, not to exceed the maximum amount authorized by this Subsection. No
other election shall be required except as provided by this Paragraph.
(b) The fee shall expire at the end of the term provided for in the proposition
authorizing the fee, not to exceed eight years, but may be renewed as provided in
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph. Any election to authorize the renewal of the fee
shall be held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. If the
fee is renewed, the term of the imposition of the fee shall be as provided in the
proposition authorizing such renewal, not to exceed eight years.
(5)(a) The fee shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time as
ad valorem taxes on property subject to taxation by the city are levied and collected.
(b) Any fee which is unpaid shall be added to the tax rolls of the city and
shall be enforced with the same authority and subject to the same penalties and
procedures as unpaid ad valorem taxes.
(6) The proceeds of such fee shall be used solely and exclusively for the
purpose and the benefit of the district; however, the city may retain one percent of
the amount collected as a collection fee.
G.(1) The board shall adopt an annual budget in accordance with the
Louisiana Local Government Budget Act, R.S. 39:1301 et seq.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1007 ENROLLED
(2) The district shall be subject to audit by the legislative auditor pursuant
to R.S. 24:513.
H.(1) It is the purpose and intent of this Section that the additional personnel
and services provided for through the fees authorized in this Section shall be
supplemental to and not in lieu of the personnel and services provided in the district
by the city of New Orleans.
(2) If the district ceases to exist, all funds of the district shall be transmitted
by the board to the city of New Orleans, and such funds, together with any other
funds collected by the city of New Orleans pursuant to this Section, shall be
maintained in a separate account by the city and shall be used only to promote,
encourage, and enhance the beautification and overall betterment of the area included
in the district.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.